Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.020

Public stadium authority—Creation—Powers and duties—Transfer of property.

(1) A public stadium authority may be created in any county that has entered into a letter of intent relating to the development of a stadium and exhibition center under chapter 220, Laws of 1997 with a team affiliate or an entity that has a contractual right to become a team affiliate.

(2) A public stadium authority shall be created upon adoption of a resolution providing for the creation of such an authority by the county legislative authority in which the proposed authority is located.

(3) A public stadium authority shall constitute a body corporate and shall possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, and to sue and be sued.

(4) The legislative authority of the county in which the public stadium authority is located, or the council of any city located in that county, may transfer property to the public stadium authority created under this chapter. Property encumbered by debt may be transferred by a county legislative authority or a city council to a public stadium authority created to develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.050, but obligation for payment of the debt may not be transferred.

[ 1997 c 220 s 102 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]